Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Summons

§ 43-21-501.
Persons on whom served.

When a petition has been filed and the date of hearing has been set by the youth court, the judge or his designee shall order the clerk of the youth court to issue a summons to the following to appear personally at such hearing:

the child named in the petition;

the person or persons who have custody or control of the child;

the parent or guardian of the child if such parent or guardian does not have custody of the child; and

any other person whom the court deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-503.
Form of summons.

The form of the summons shall be substantially as follows:

State of Mississippi

County of In the Court of County Youth Court Division No. In the Interest of . SUMMONS TO: You are required to serve the following: TO: You are commanded to appear personally before the Court of County at the Courthouse in , Mississippi, at o’clock on , the day of , 2, for a hearing for the purpose set forth in the petition. is required to produce at the above-named hearing. You have a right to be represented by an attorney. You are requested to immediately notify the youth court of the name of your attorney. If indigent, the above-named child has a right to have an attorney appointed for him free of charge, and should immediately apply to the youth court for such appointed counsel. You have a right to subpoena witnesses in your behalf. GIVEN under hand and seal of court, at , Mississippi, this the day of , 2. , Clerk , D.C.

Click to view

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-505.
Method of service.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, service of summons shall be made personally by delivery of a copy of the summons with a copy of the petition in a sealed envelope attached to the summons. A child may be served in the same manner as an adult.

Service of the summons and petition, motions, notices and all other papers upon a child who has not reached his fourteenth birthday shall be effectuated by making service upon his parent, guardian or custodian and guardian ad litem, if any.

If any parent or guardian does not reside within the state or cannot be located therein, the clerk shall issue summons to the guardian ad litem. If the name and post office address of the parent or guardian who does not reside within the state or cannot be located therein can be ascertained, the clerk shall mail by “certified mail” ten (10) days before the date set for the hearing a copy of the summons with a copy of the petition attached to the summons to such parent or guardian. The clerk shall note the fact of such mailing upon the court docket. Ten (10) days after the summons has been mailed, the youth court may take jurisdiction as if summons had been personally served as herein provided.

The service of summons as required by this chapter shall be made by any person appointed by the youth court judge. Such person, for this purpose, shall be an officer of the youth court.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, notice of the time, date, place and purpose of any hearing other than adjudicatory and transfer hearings shall be given to all parties in person in court or by mail, or in any other manner as the youth court may direct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-507.
Time of service.

Summons shall be served not less than three (3) days before the date set for the adjudicatory hearing of proceedings concerning the child.

A party other than the child may waive service of summons on himself by written stipulation or by voluntary appearance at the hearing and in the case of written stipulation or voluntary appearance, the youth court may, in its discretion, proceed to a hearing regardless of the date set for the hearing if all other parties are properly before the youth court. At the time of the waiver, a copy of the petition shall be given to the party.

If a child is served with process, the child may waive the three (3) days’ time before the hearing, and the youth court may, in its discretion, proceed to a hearing regardless of the date set for the hearing if all other parties are properly before the youth court and the youth court finds all of the following:

the child fully understands his rights and fully understands the potential consequences of the hearing;

the child voluntarily, intelligently, and knowingly waives his rights to three (3) days’ time before the hearing;

the child is effectively represented by counsel; and

the child has had in fact sufficient time to prepare.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-509.
Warrant for failure to obey summons.

If any person summoned as herein provided shall without reasonable cause (the judge to determine what is reasonable cause) fails to appear, he may be proceeded against for contempt of court. In case the summons cannot be served or the parties served with summons fail to obey the same, or in any case when it shall be made to appear to the youth court that the service of summons will be ineffectual or the welfare of a child requires that he shall be brought forthwith into the custody of the youth court, a warrant or custody order may be issued against the parent, parents, guardian or custodian or against the child.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1979.